Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2472.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Staff Sergeant John P. Parks Memorial Bridge.(a) Findings.--The General Assembly finds and declares as follows:(1) John P. Parks was born June 21, 1913, in Beaverdale and was the son of the late William and Mary (Ronan) Parks.(2) Staff Sergeant Parks attended Windber Area Schools in Windber.(3) Staff Sergeant Parks had ten brothers and sisters: Edward, William, Duane, Steven, Loretta, Bertha, Agnes, Patrick, Mary and Patricia.(4) Staff Sergeant Parks was married to Theresa (Roden) Parks.(5) Outside of service, Staff Sergeant Parks was employed by Ebensburg Center, attended Holy Child Jesus 12345678910111213141516171819 Catholic Church in Windber and was a member at American Legion Post 137, formerly Hunter Weaver Post 795, VFW and DAV Post 795.(6) Staff Sergeant Parks enlisted in the United States Army on January 21, 1941, and trained at Army camps in Texas, Wisconsin and Louisiana before going overseas in October 1941.(7) During deployment, Staff Sergeant Parks accomplished a feat of heroism while occupying Guipavas, France.(8) After discovering a machine gun position, approximately 30 yards to its front, the patrol was preparing to withdraw when Staff Sergeant Parks charged the German crew and seized control before the six Nazi gunners could fire so much as a single shot.(9) With the machine gun knocked out, 21 other Germans emerged from foxholes and hedgerows, surrendering to Staff Sergeant Parks.(10) Staff Sergeant Parks was a recipient of the Purple Heart, Silver Star and Bronze Star.(11) Accompanying the award of the Silver Star was a citation telling in detail of his action stating, "the gallantry and initiative above and beyond the duty displayed by this enlisted man are in keeping with the highest tradition of service."(12) Staff Sergeant John P. Parks passed away at his home in Windber on January 21, 1995, survived by one brother and two sisters.(b) Designation.--The bridge, identified as Bridge Key 31485, located on Pennsylvania Route 601 in Paint Borough, Somerset County, is designated the Staff Sergeant John P. Parks 20260HB2472PN3305 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Memorial Bridge.(c) Signs.--The Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs displaying the name of the bridge to traffic in both directions on the bridge.Section 2. Effective date.This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2472PN3305 - 3 - 123456